Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202618-3542
Appointment of an administrator; petition; conditions.

A petition may be filed with the district court of the county in which a majority of the real property of a community improvement district is located for referral of the community improvement district to the city council of the city or board of trustees of the village in which the community improvement district is located for the appointment of an administrator of the community improvement district and suspension of the authority of the board of trustees of the community improvement district or other relief as provided by sections 18-3543 to 18-3551. Such petition may be filed by: (1) A majority of the board of trustees of the community improvement district; (2) the holders of more than fifty percent in principal amount of the outstanding bonds of the community improvement district; (3) the holders of more than fifty percent in principal amount of outstanding construction fund warrants of the community improvement district; (4) a majority of the lessees permitted to vote pursuant to section 18-3514 who are residents of the community improvement district and resident property owners of the community improvement district; (5) the owners of more than one-half of the real property within the community improvement district; or (6) a city or village in which the community improvement district is located and which exercises zoning jurisdiction over the community improvement district. A petition filed by a city or village pursuant to subdivision (6) of this section may be filed only on grounds that the community improvement district has issued outstanding bonds or construction fund warrants which have been in default for more than ninety days or the community improvement district lacks a functioning board of trustees.

Laws 2026, LB1114, § 42.
April 17, 2026